Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Merchandise.

Sec. 45.45.100.
Requiring individuals to keep merchandise in full view.

A merchant may request an individual on the merchant’s premises to place or keep in full view merchandise that the individual removes, or that the merchant believes the individual may have removed, from its place of display or elsewhere, whether for examination, purchase, or another purpose.
A merchant is not criminally or civilly liable for making this request.

History.

(§ 2 ch 4 SLA 1957)

Sec. 45.45.105.
Unsolicited merchandise.

A person may not offer merchandise for sale, in any manner, when the offer includes the voluntary and unsolicited sending of merchandise not actually ordered or requested by the recipient, either orally or in writing.

Unsolicited merchandise received shall be considered an unconditional gift to the recipient who may use or dispose of it in any manner the recipient sees fit without obligation to the sender.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1969)

Sec. 45.45.110.
Definitions.

In AS

45.45.100

and

45.45.105

,

“merchandise” means personal property capable of manual delivery that is produced, displayed, held, or offered for sale by a manufacturer, distributor, or merchant;

“merchant” means an owner or operator of a place of business used for displaying, holding, or selling personal property capable of manual delivery, and the agent, consignee, employee, lessee, or officer of the owner or operator;

“premises” means an establishment or part of one in which merchandise is displayed, held, or offered for sale.

History.

(§ 1 ch 4 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 39 SLA 1969)